Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1702
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-1701 to 81-1721 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Consultants' Competitive Negotiation Act.

Laws 1978, LB 715, § 2.